Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF359.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1248YH (2) 91 jm/md H.F. 359 Section 1. Section 445.5, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraphs: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . j. (1) A statement of how much less funding 3 the titleholderâs school district received in the current 4 school year from the previous school year as a result of 5 students receiving education savings account payments pursuant 6 to section 257.11B if such a reduction of funding exists. 7 (2) The department of management shall make all 8 calculations necessary to determine the information required 9 to be disclosed pursuant to subparagraph (1) and transmit such 10 information to the treasurer in a timely manner. 11 NEW PARAGRAPH . k. (1) A statement of how much of the 12 titleholderâs state income taxes have been used to fund the 13 education savings account program established in section 14 257.11B. 15 (2) The department of management and the department of 16 revenue shall collaborate to make all calculations necessary 17 to determine the information required to be disclosed pursuant 18 to subparagraph (1) and the department of management shall 19 transmit such information to the treasurer in a timely manner. 20 NEW PARAGRAPH . l. (1) The following or substantially 21 similar statement: 22 The gross reduction in state funding to your school district 23 in (the current school year) as a result of students receiving 24 education savings account payments is (amount). 25 (2) The department of management shall make all 26 calculations necessary to determine the information required 27 to be disclosed pursuant to subparagraph (1) and transmit such 28 information to the treasurer in a timely manner. 29